DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER DI-371
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI29A-06

DTC C 1253 /53 Motor Relay Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The ABS motor relay supplies power to the hydraulic brake booster pump motor. While the ABS is activated,
the ECU switches the motor relay ON and operates the hydraulic brake booster pump motor.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

When any ofthefollowing (1) through (4) is detected:

(1) Afterturning the ignition switch ON, openintherelay
coilisdetectedformorethan 1 sec.

(2) When the pressure switch does not control motor
driving, the condition that the motor relay is always ON
continuesformorethan 1 sec.duetoshortcircuit.

C1253/53 (8) Whenthe pressure switch (PH) detects the low
pressure or while the pump motor operatestoincrease
the pressure, the condition that the motor relay does not
turn ON continues for more than 0.2 secs.

(4) When pressure switch does not control motor driving,
the condition that the motor relay is always ON due to
the welded contact continues for more than 2 secs.

* ABS motorrelay
« ABS motorrelay circuit
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit

Fail safe function:

If trouble occurs in the ABS motor relay circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohib-
its ABS control.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

Start the inspection from step 1 in case of using the hand-held tester and start from step 3 in case of not
using hand-held tester.

1 Check ABS motor relay operation.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode on the hand-held tester.
CHECK:
Check the operation sound of the ABS motor relays individually when operating it with the hand-held tester.
OK:
The operation sound of the ABS motor relay should be heard.

NG> Go to step 3.

@

2 [ Check for short circuit (to B+) in harness and connector between MT of hydrau-
lic brake booster and ABS ECU (See page IN-24).

0K> Check and replace ABS ECU.

e ]
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3Checkvoltage betweenterminal 1 ofEngine RoomR/BNo.2 (for ABS motor

relay) and body ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS motor relay from Engine Room R/B No. 2.
CHECK:
Measure voltage betweenterminal 1 of Engine Room R/B No.
2 (for ABS motor relay) and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 10 - 14V

F04446

NG> Check and repair harness or connector.
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SUPPLY SYSTEM

4 | Check ABS motor relays.

BE 1840
R15257
R15258

F00044

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

PREPARATION:

Remove the 2 ABS motor relays from Engine Room R/B No. 2.
CHECK:

Check continuity between each pair of terminal of motor relay.
OK:

Continuity

Terminals 3 and 4
(Reference value *1)

Terminals 1 and 2 Open

*1: Motor relay 1 62 Q
Motor relay 2 54 Q

CHECK:

(@) Apply battery voltage between terminals 3 and 4.
(b)  Check continuity between 1 and 2 terminals.
OK:

| Terminals 1 and 2 | Continuity

NG> Replace ABS motor relay.
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5 [ Check continuity between each terminal BM1 and BM2 and terminal MTT of ABS
ECU.

Motor 1 Motor 2 PREPARATION:

Relay @ Relay @ Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.

CHECK:

(@) Check continuity between terminal BM1 of ABS motor
relay and terminal MT of ABS ECU.

(b) Check continuity between terminal BM2 of ABS motor
relay and terminal MT of ABS ECU.

OK:
Continuity

HINT:

There is resistance of 33 =[3]Q2 between terminal BM1or BM2

and MTT of the hydraulic brake booster.

Motor Relay

F04276

booster.

NG> Repair or replace harness or hydraulic brake

OK

6 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS motor
relay and ABS ECU (See page IN-24).

@

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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